Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 423.3, subsection 47A, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. The sales price from the sale of central office equipment or transmission equipment primarily used in the furnishing of telecommunications services, internet access services, or a combination of these, on a commercial basis by local exchange carriers and competitive local exchange service providers; by franchised cable television operators, mutual companies, municipal utilities, cooperatives, and companies furnishing communications services that are not subject to rate regulation as provided in chapter 476 ; by long distance companies as House File 960, p. 2 defined in section 477.10 ; or for by a provider of commercial mobile radio service as defined in 47 C.F.R. Â§20.3 in the furnishing of telecommunications services on a commercial basis . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 960, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor